Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201381-8,117
Land surveying; eligibility for
registration; requirements.

(1) No person shall be eligible for registration
unless:

(a) He or she has successfully
passed an examination, designed to
determine his or her proficiency and qualification to engage in the practice
of land surveying. No applicant shall be entitled to take such examination
until he or she shows the necessary practical experience in land surveying
work; and

(b) He or she (i) has not less than six years of surveying
experience of which five years must be as defined in subdivision (4) of section
81-8,109, and three of such five years
must have been in a responsible position as a subordinate to a licensed land
surveyor, or (ii) has graduated, after
a course of not less than four years in surveying, engineering, or other approved
curriculum, with proportionate credit for lesser time, from a school or college
approved by the examining board as of satisfactory standing and has an
additional two years of practice in a responsible position.

(2) For purposes of this
section, responsible position means a position that requires initiative, skill,
and independent judgment and does not include the position of chainman, rodman,
instrument person, ordinary drafter, or other position performing routine
work.

Laws 1957, c. 383, § 10, p. 1334;

Laws 1969, c. 764, § 3, p. 2894;

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 21;

Laws 1974, LB 811, § 19;

Laws 1984, LB 478, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 15;

Laws 2013, LB303, § 3.